Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. Alaska Student Loan Corporation.

Sec. 14.42.100.
Creation of Alaska Student Loan Corporation.

There is created the Alaska Student Loan Corporation. The corporation is a public corporation and government instrumentality within the Department of Education and Early Development but having a legal existence independent of and separate from the state. The corporation may not be terminated as long as it has bonds, notes, or other obligations outstanding. Upon termination of the corporation, its rights and property pass to the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 14.42.110.
Purpose of corporation. [Repealed, § 31 ch 63 SLA 2004.]

Sec. 14.42.120.
Corporation governing body.

The corporation shall be governed by a board of directors appointed by the governor consisting of two members of the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education, each of whom is selected for the commission under AS

14.42.015(a)(1)

— (2), (4) — (6), (8), or (9) and the commissioner of revenue, the commissioner of administration, and the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development. Members of the board serve without compensation but the members who are also members of the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized by law for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

The board shall elect a chairman from among its membership at its annual meeting each year. A majority of the members constitute a quorum for organizing the board, conducting its business, and exercising the powers of the corporation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” in (a) of this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 14.42.130.
Meetings of the board.

The board shall meet at the call of its chairman and at other times as the board may determine in accordance with its regulations.

Public notice of a meeting of the board at which the issuance of corporation bonds is authorized shall be provided at least 24 hours before the meeting.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987)

Sec. 14.42.140.
Minutes of meetings.

The board shall keep minutes of each meeting and send a certified copy to the governor and to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987)

Sec. 14.42.150.
Administration of affairs.

The board shall manage the assets and business of the corporation and may adopt bylaws and regulations, in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), governing the manner in which the business of the corporation is conducted and the manner in which its powers are exercised. The board shall delegate supervision of the administration of the corporation to the executive officer of the corporation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska student loan corporation, see 20 AAC 15, art. 10.

Sec. 14.42.160.
Executive officer.

The executive officer of the Commission on Postsecondary Education appointed under AS

14.42.040(a)

shall serve as executive officer of the corporation. The board shall prescribe the duties of the executive officer.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987)

Sec. 14.42.170.
Staff.

The employees of the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary Education shall serve as staff for the corporation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987)

Sec. 14.42.190.
Budget.

The operating budget of the corporation is subject to AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act).

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987)

Sec. 14.42.200.
General powers.

In addition to other powers granted in this chapter, the corporation may

sue and be sued in its own name;

adopt an official seal;

adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

make and execute agreements, contracts, and other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the corporation, including contracts with a person or governmental entity;

receive, take, hold, and administer, on behalf of the corporation and for any of its purposes, any appropriation, gift, grant, bequest, devise, or donation of real property or personal property; in this paragraph, “property” includes

money; and

life estates, leases, or other interests in property;

borrow money as provided in this chapter to carry out its corporate purposes and issue its obligations as evidence of the borrowing, if that obligation of the corporation is not a debt of the state;

include in a borrowing the amounts to pay financing charges, interest on the obligations for a period not exceeding one year after the date on which the corporation estimates funds will otherwise be available to pay the interest, consultant, advisory, and legal fees, and other expenses necessary or incident to the borrowing;

invest or reinvest, subject to its contracts with noteholders and bondholders, money held by the corporation as set out in AS

37.10.071

;

set and collect interest, fees, and charges in connection with education loans or repayment obligations held by the corporation and its servicing agents; in this paragraph, “charges” includes costs of financing by the corporation, service charges, insurance premiums, and other costs incurred by the corporation in carrying out its corporate purposes;

gather information on postsecondary education financial resources available to residents of this state and disseminate the information to reasonably assure that qualified residents are aware of those financial resources;

service education loans and repayment obligations held by the corporation;

finance, purchase, or participate in the financing or purchasing of education loans;

contract in advance for the financing, purchasing, or sale of education loans;

sell or participate in the sale, either public or private and on terms authorized by the board, of education loans to the Student Loan Marketing Association or to other purchasers;

collect and pay reasonable fees and charges in connection with the financing, purchase, sale, and servicing of education loans and repayment obligations;

enter into agreements with the federal government, including guaranty agreements and supplemental guaranty agreements as described in 20 U.S.C. 1001 — 1155, as amended, as necessary to provide for the receipt by the corporation of administrative allowances and other benefits available under 20 U.S.C. 1001 — 1155, as amended;

administer federal money allotted to the state involving insured education loans and related administrative costs and other matters;

enter into agreements with the commission relating to education loans and repayment obligations, the administration of the financial aid and loan programs under AS

14.43.091

—

14.43.750

,

14.43.990

, and AS 14.44, and the payment of and security for bonds of the corporation;

to the extent permitted under contracts with bondholders, consent to the modification of the rate of interest, time of payment of an installment of principal or interest, or other terms of an education loan or repayment obligation held by the corporation;

procure insurance against any loss in connection with the operation of its programs;

provide advisory services to borrowers and other participants in the corporation’s programs;

enter into credit facility agreements and make pledges, covenants, and agreements with respect to the repayment of borrowings under the credit facility agreements;

develop and implement education financing programs; in this paragraph, “programs” includes

programs listed in AS

14.42.030(b)(1)

;

programs for the guaranteeing, servicing, originating, and financing of education loans for borrowers located both inside and outside the state; and

federal financial aid programs made under federal law; and

perform acts that may be necessary or appropriate to carry out effectively the general objectives and purposes of the corporation under AS

14.42.100

—

14.42.990

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987; am § 10 ch 141 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 1997; am § 7 ch 85 SLA 2001; am § 5 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For an additional duty of the corporation, requiring development of a proposal for a state program under which the state would repay all or part of loans to students for costs of postsecondary education and requiring submission to the legislature on January 19, 2010, see § 3, ch. 48, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For AlaskAdvantage federal consolidation loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 2.

For Alaska student loan corporation, see 20 AAC 15, art. 10.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, in the introductory language in (5), deleted “if that obligation of the corporation is not a debt of the state” following “personal property”, and inserted the same phrase at the end of (6); in (12), inserted “finance,” at the beginning, and substituted “financing or purchasing” for “purchase” near the end”; in (13), substituted “financing, purchasing” for “purchase”; in (15), inserted “financing,” following “in connection with”.

Sec. 14.42.205.
Supplemental education loans: financing program.

The purpose of this section is to provide for supplemental education loan financing to assist qualified borrowers with unmet costs of attendance at a postsecondary institution approved by the commission.

The corporation may develop and establish a financing program for the Alaska supplemental education loan administered by the commission under AS

14.43.170

—

14.43.175

.

The financing program established under (b) of this section

shall

provide that loans under the Alaska supplemental education loan program are medium-range and long-range fixed-rate and variable-rate loans;

require terms and conditions for loans under the Alaska supplemental education loan program as the corporation determines are useful and feasible;

be designed to

assist postsecondary institutions in this state in attracting and retaining students;

maximize the amount of financing available by using private activity tax-exempt bond capacity as may be allocated by the state; and

except as limited by (1)(B) of this subsection, may provide for terms and conditions that are more attractive than prevailing terms and conditions available to students from other supplemental education lenders.

History.

(§ 8 ch 85 SLA 2001; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska student loan corporation, see 20 AAC 15, art. 10.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, in (a), substituted “with unmet costs of attendance at a postsecondary institution approved by the commission” for “in meeting postsecondary education costs for which federal and private financial aid may be insufficient”; in (b), deleted “program” following “supplemental education loan”; in (c), deleted (c)(1)(A)(ii), which read, “structured to operate as lines of credit”, and deleted the (i) designation.

Sec. 14.42.210.
Education loan fund and program administration.

The education loan fund is established in the corporation. The education loan fund is a trust fund to be used to carry out the purposes of AS

14.42.100

—

14.42.990

, AS

14.43.091

—

14.43.175

,

14.43.600

—

14.43.700

,

14.43.710

—

14.43.750

,

14.43.990

, and AS

14.44.025

. The fund consists of money or assets appropriated or transferred to the corporation for the fund and money or assets deposited in it by the corporation. The corporation may establish separate accounts in the fund.

Money and other assets of the education loan fund may be used to

secure bonds of the corporation;

pay the costs of administration of the fund;

invest in education loans and investments under AS

37.10.071

;

finance programs approved under AS

14.43.091

—

14.43.175

,

14.43.600

—

14.43.700

,

14.43.710

—

14.43.750

, or AS

14.44.040

; and

pay the costs of administering and collecting the loans and repayment obligations under the financial aid programs listed in (4) of this subsection.

The financial aid programs listed in (b)(4) of this section shall be administered by the commission. The corporation and the commission may enter into agreements relating to the administration of the programs. The corporation may assign its rights under the agreements for the benefit and security of holders of its bonds.

The corporation may provide for terms and conditions for use of the education loan fund that are more favorable than prevailing terms and conditions available to students from other education lenders.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987; am § 11 ch 141 SLA 1988; am §§ 2, 3 ch 54 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 23 SLA 1999; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 85 SLA 2001; am §§ 2, 3 ch 63 SLA 2004; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For AlaskAdvantage federal consolidation loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 2.

For Alaska student loan corporation, see 20 AAC 15, art. 10.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, in (a) and (b), deleted the citations to AS

14.43.400

—

14.43.420

; and added (d).

Sec. 14.42.215.
Interest.

The corporation shall set the interest rate on a loan financed by the corporation under AS

14.43.091

—

14.43.160

,

14.43.170

—

14.43.175

,

14.43.710

—

14.43.750

, and AS

14.44.040

. Interest on a loan accrues from the time the loan is disbursed.

A borrower may elect to make payments of interest that accrues during the borrower’s term of attendance at the postsecondary institution or during authorized deferment periods; however, any unpaid interest shall be capitalized as part of the principal to be repaid as agreed, or upon graduation, withdrawal, or completion of the deferment period.

History.

(§ 12 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 48, ch. 89, SLA 2014 makes this section effective July 17, 2014.

Sec. 14.42.220.
Bonds of the corporation.

The corporation may borrow money and may issue bonds, on which the principal and interest are payable from its income and receipts or other assets or a designated part or parts of them. The corporation may use the proceeds of its bonds for any purposes that the corporation considers appropriate, including providing money to

make or purchase education loans;

finance programs identified in AS

14.42.210

;

finance projects of the state as those projects may be identified by law; and

pay for any other purpose or program of the corporation that is authorized in AS

14.42.100

—

14.42.310

.

Bonds may be authorized only by resolution of the board. Bonds shall be dated, bear interest at the rate or rates, be in the denominations, be in the form, either coupon or registered, carry the registration privileges, be executed in the manner, be payable in the medium of payment, at the place or places, be subject to the terms of redemption, and mature as provided by the resolution or a subsequent resolution. However, a bond may not mature more than 40 years after the date it is issued.

Bonds of the corporation, regardless of form or character, are negotiable instruments for all the purposes of AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29 (Uniform Commercial Code).

Bonds of the corporation may be sold at public or private sale in the manner, for the price or prices, and at the time or times that the board determines.

The superior court has jurisdiction to hear and determine proceedings relating to the corporation, including proceedings brought by or for the benefit of a bondholder or by a trustee for or other representative of a bondholder.

[Repealed, § 31 ch 63 SLA 2004.]

The corporation may not issue bonds to finance projects under (a)(3) of this section in an aggregate amount that exceeds $280,000,000.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987; am §§ 12, 13 ch 85 SLA 2001; am §§ 4, 5, 31 ch 63 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1993, under § 13, ch. 34, SLA 1993 and § 128, ch. 35, SLA 1993 the citation to the Uniform Commercial Code was revised.

In 2000, “AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.01 — AS
45.09, AS 45.12, and AS 45.14” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Sec. 14.42.230.
Trust indentures and trust agreements.

An issue of bonds by the corporation may be secured by a trust indenture or trust agreement between the corporation and a corporate trustee, which may be a trust company, bank, or national banking association, with corporate trust powers, located inside or outside the state, or by a secured loan agreement or other instrument or under a resolution giving powers to a corporate trustee by means of which the corporation may

enter into agreements with the trustee or the bondholders that the board determines to be necessary or desirable, including covenants, provisions, limitations, and other agreements as to the

application, investment, deposit, use, and disposition of the proceeds of bonds of the corporation or of money or other property of the corporation or in which it has an interest;

fixing and collecting of payments and other consideration for an education loan or repayment obligation;

assignment by the corporation of its rights in an education loan or repayment obligation or in a mortgage or other security interest created with respect to an education loan or repayment obligation to a trustee for the benefit of bondholders;

terms and conditions upon which additional bonds of the corporation may be issued;

vesting in a trustee of rights, powers, duties, funds, or property in trust for the benefit of bondholders, including the right to enforce payment, performance, and other rights of the corporation or of the bondholders, under an education loan or repayment obligation or a security interest created with respect to an education loan or repayment obligation;

pledge, mortgage, or assign money, agreements, property, or other assets of the corporation either presently in hand or to be received in the future, or both; and

provide for other matters that in any way affect the security or protection of the bonds.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987; am § 14 ch 85 SLA 2001)

Sec. 14.42.240.
Reserves and capital reserves.

For the purpose of securing one or more issues of bonds of the corporation, the board may establish one or more special funds, called “capital reserve funds,” and may pay into those capital reserve funds the proceeds of the sale of bonds and other money available to the corporation from other sources for the purposes of the capital reserve funds. A capital reserve fund may be established only if the board determines that the establishment of the fund would enhance the marketability of the bonds. Money in a capital reserve fund, except as provided in this section, may be used as required only for the (1) payment of the principal of, and interest on, bonds or of the sinking fund payments with respect to those bonds; (2) purchase or redemption of the bonds; or (3) payment of a redemption premium required to be paid when the bonds are redeemed before maturity. However, money in a capital reserve fund may not be withdrawn if the withdrawal would reduce the amount in the capital reserve fund to less than the capital reserve fund requirement, except for the purpose of making payment, when due, of principal, interest, or redemption premiums on the bonds when other money of the corporation is not available for the payments. Income or interest earned by, or increment to, a capital reserve fund, from the investment of all or part of the fund, may be transferred by the corporation to other funds or accounts of the corporation if the transfer does not reduce the amount of the capital reserve fund below the capital reserve fund requirement.

If the board decides to issue bonds secured by a capital reserve fund, the bonds may not be issued if the amount in the capital reserve fund is less than the capital reserve fund requirement, unless the corporation, at the time of issuance of the bonds, pledges to deposit in the capital reserve fund from the proceeds of the bonds to be issued or from other sources, an amount that, together with the amount then in the fund, is not less than the capital reserve fund requirement.

In computing the amount of a capital reserve fund for the purpose of this section, securities in which all or a portion of the fund is invested and credit facilities deposited in or credited to a capital reserve fund under (f) of this section shall be valued by a reasonable method established by the board by resolution or by trust indenture. Valuation shall include the amount of interest earned or accrued as of the date of valuation.

By January 15 of each year, the chairman of the board shall certify in writing to the governor and the legislature the amount, if any, required to restore a capital reserve fund to the capital reserve fund requirement. The legislature may appropriate to the corporation the amount certified by the chairman. The corporation shall deposit the amounts appropriated under this subsection during a fiscal year in the proper capital reserve fund. This subsection does not create a debt or liability of the state.

The board may establish reserve funds, other than capital reserve funds, to secure one or more issues of bonds of the corporation. The corporation may deposit in a reserve fund established under this subsection the proceeds of sale of its bonds and other money available from any other source. The corporation may allow a reserve fund established under this subsection to be depleted without complying with (d) of this section.

The corporation may hold in a capital reserve fund, in lieu of money and in satisfaction of all or part of a capital reserve fund requirement, irrevocable letters of credit issued by a commercial bank, surety bonds, insurance policies, and similar credit facilities.

In this section, “capital reserve fund requirement” means the amount required to be on deposit in the capital reserve fund as of the date of computation as determined by resolution of the board or by trust indenture.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987; am §§ 13, 14 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, in (c), added “or by trust indenture” at the end of the first sentence, and in (g), added “or by trust indenture” at the end of the subsection.

Sec. 14.42.250.
Validity of pledge.

It is the intention of the legislature that a pledge made in respect to bonds of the corporation shall be valid, perfected, and binding from the time the pledge is made; that the money or property so pledged and thereafter received by the corporation shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without physical delivery or further act; and that the lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the corporation irrespective of whether the parties have notice. Neither the resolution, trust agreement, nor other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded or filed under the provisions of AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29 (Uniform Commercial Code) to be valid, perfected, binding, or effective.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987; am § 15 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1993, under § 13, ch. 34, SLA 1993 and § 128, ch. 35, SLA 1993 the citation to the Uniform Commercial Code was revised.

In 2000, “AS 45.01 — AS 45.08, AS 45.12, AS 45.14, and AS 45.29” was substituted for “AS 45.01 — AS
45.09, AS 45.12, and AS 45.14” in accordance with § 35, ch. 113, SLA 2000.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, twice inserted “perfected,” following “, valid”.

Sec. 14.42.260.
Nonliability on bonds.

The members of the board and individuals executing the bonds of the corporation are not liable personally on the bonds or subject to personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance of the bonds.

The bonds issued by the corporation do not constitute an indebtedness or other liability of the state or of a political subdivision of the state, except the corporation, but shall be payable solely from the income and receipts or other funds or property of the corporation. The corporation may not pledge the faith or credit of the state, or of a political subdivision of the state, except the corporation, to the payment of a bond. Issuance of a bond by the corporation does not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the state or a political subdivision of the state to apply money from, or levy or pledge any form of taxation whatever to the payment of the bond.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987)

Sec. 14.42.265.
Underwriters.

The board may select one or more underwriters for its bonds in accordance with procedures

for the award of a contract under AS

36.30.200

—

36.30.260

; or

adopted by regulations of the board that are based on the competitive principles of AS

36.30.200

—

36.30.260

and are adapted to the special needs of the corporation in the selling of its bonds as determined by the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For Alaska student loan corporation, see 20 AAC 15, art. 10.

Sec. 14.42.270.
Pledge and agreement of state.

The state pledges to and agrees with holders of bonds issued by the corporation that the state will not limit or alter the rights and powers vested in the corporation under AS

14.42.100

—

14.42.990

to fulfill the terms of a contract made by the corporation with the bondholders or in any way impair the rights and remedies of the bondholders until the bonds, together with the interest on them with interest on unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with an action or proceeding by or on behalf of the bondholders, are fully met and discharged. The corporation may include this pledge and agreement of the state in a contract with bondholders.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987; am § 15 ch 85 SLA 2001)

Sec. 14.42.280.
Exemption from taxation.

The real and personal property of the corporation and its assets, income, and receipts are declared to be the property of a political subdivision of the state and devoted to an essential public and governmental function and purpose, and the property, assets, income, receipts, and other interests of the corporation are exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the state or a political subdivision of the state, including municipalities, school districts, public utility districts, and other governmental units. Bonds of the corporation are declared to be issued by a political subdivision of the state and for an essential public and governmental purpose, and the bonds, interest on them, income from them, and transfer of them, and all assets, income, and receipts pledged to pay or secure the payment of the bonds, or interest on them, are exempt from taxation by or under the authority of the state, except for inheritance and estate taxes and taxes on transfers by or in contemplation of death.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987)

Sec. 14.42.290.
Bonds legal investments for fiduciaries.

The bonds of the corporation are securities in which public officers and bodies of the state, municipalities, insurance companies, insurance associations, other persons carrying on an insurance business, banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks, savings associations, building and loan associations, investment companies, other persons carrying on a banking business, administrators, guardians, executors, trustees, other fiduciaries, and other persons who are authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state, may properly and legally invest funds including capital in their control or belonging to them. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the bonds of the corporation are also securities that may be deposited with and may be received by public officers and bodies of the state and municipalities for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the state is now or may be authorized.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987)

Sec. 14.42.295.
Payment to state.

The board may elect to pay the state a return of contributed capital, or a dividend, for each base fiscal year that the corporation’s net income equals or exceeds $2,000,000. The payment may not be less than 10 percent nor more than 35 percent, as approved by the board, of the corporation’s net income for the base fiscal year, and is subject to the provisions of any applicable bond indentures of the corporation. If a payment is authorized under this section, payment must be made available by the corporation before the end of the fiscal year in which payment has been authorized. The corporation shall notify the commissioner of revenue when the amount of the payment authorized under this section is available for appropriation.

In this section,

“base fiscal year” means the fiscal year ending two years before the end of the fiscal year in which a payment under this section is to be made available;

“contributed capital” means the assets appropriated by sec. 2, ch. 93, SLA 1987, in the form of unrestricted receipts of loans;

“dividend” means return of surplus as reflected in the equity section of the corporation’s audited financial statements for the education loan fund (AS

14.42.210

);

“net income” means the corporation’s net income as set out in the audited financial statements of the corporation for the base fiscal year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 98 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2001, in (b)(3) of this section, “education loan fund” was substituted for “student loan fund” in accordance with § 45(d), ch. 85, SLA 2001.

Sec. 14.42.300.
Operation of certain statutes excepted.

The corporation is not a municipality as the term is defined in AS

01.10.060

. Except as provided in AS

14.42.190

, the corporation is not subject to AS 37. For all other purposes the corporation is a political subdivision and an instrumentality of the state.

The funds, income, and receipts of the corporation are not money of the state, nor may real property in which the corporation has an interest be considered land owned in fee by the state or to which the state may become entitled or in any way land belonging to the state, or state land referred to in art. VIII of the Alaska Constitution.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987)

Sec. 14.42.310.
Annual audit.

The financial records of the corporation shall be audited annually by the legislative auditor or by a certified public accountant approved by the legislative auditor. The legislative auditor may prescribe the form and content of the financial records of the corporation and shall have access to these records at any time.

History.

(§ 2 ch 92 SLA 1987)

Sec. 14.42.390.
Definitions. [Repealed, § 42 ch 85 SLA 2001.]